Massachusetts, session 194th, H2881.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 3 of Chapter 32 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2018
Official Edition, is hereby amended by inserting after the words "Cushing Hospital", the
following words: - " Aerial foresters or Tree Crewmen of the Massachusetts Department of
Conservation and Recreation."
of 1